District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Volunteer Services Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 3 of the Volunteers Services Act of 1977, effective June 28, 1977 (D.C.
Law 2-12; D.C. Official Code § 1-319.02), is amended by striking the phrase “District of
Columbia Board of Education” and inserting the phrase “District of Columbia Board of
Education, Attorney General for the District of Columbia,” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2